Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2247.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 672.1(a) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended to read:Section 672.1. School Districts Lying in More Than One County or in More Than One Municipality; Limitation on Total Tax Revenues.--(a) Whenever a school district shall lie in more than one county, the total taxes levied on real estate within the school district in each county shall be subject to:(1) the limitation that the ratio which such total taxes bears to the most recent valuation of the same properties by the State Tax Equalization Board shall be uniform in all of the 1234567891011121314151617181920 counties, and the school district shall adjust its rate of taxation applicable to the portion of the district in each county to the extent necessary to achieve such uniformity; [or](2) as an alternative to the method provided in clause (1) [or], (3) or (4), whenever a school district shall lie in more than one county the board of assessment and revision of taxes in any of the counties or all of the counties in which the school district is located shall, at the request of the school directors of the district, furnish the market value of each parcel of property on the tax roll required to be furnished to the school directors under any assessment law of the Commonwealth. The market value of each parcel shall be (i) the quotient of the assessed value divided by the latest ratio of assessed value to market value in the municipality as determined by the State Tax Equalization Board, or (ii) at the option of the school district, the market value of each parcel shall be the quotient of the assessed value divided by the latest ratio of assessed value to market value as determined by the State Tax Equalization Board in the aggregate of all municipalities of the school district within the county, or (iii) at the option of the school district where there are two or more ratios of assessed value to market value, the school directors of that school district shall select the lowest of the ratios for a uniform assessed value to market value throughout the school district, or (iv) at the option of the school district where such school district is located in a home rule county, the school directors of that school district may use the county assessments. Under this clause, the school directors shall set a tax rate based upon a percentage not exceeding seventy-five (75) per centum of such market values which shall be uniform throughout the 20260HB2247PN2938 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 district; [or](3) as an alternative to the methods provided in clauses (1) [and], (2) and (4), whenever a school district shall lie in more than one county, the school directors of the district may set the millage at a uniform rate for the entire district if the counties are assessed at one hundred (100) per centum of the market value and the counties are using the same base year for assessed value and market value[.]; or(4) as an alternative to the methods provided in clauses (1), (2) and (3), whenever a school district shall lie in more than one county, the school directors of the district may set the millage rate change at a uniform rate for the entire district pursuant to the limitation in section 313 of the act of June 27, 2006 (1st Sp.Sess., P.L.1873, No.1), known as the "Taxpayer Relief Act," in the same manner as a school district that lies in only one county.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2247PN2938 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718